Montana, session 2025, SB119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are
repealed:
69-5-201. Definitions.
69-5-202. Right of first refusal.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective Date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 119